Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. COURTS

CHAPTER 26. CONSTITUTIONAL COUNTY COURTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 26.001. BOND. (a) Before beginning the duties of the office, the county judge must execute a bond that:

(1) is payable to the treasurer of the county;

(2) is in the amount set by the commissioners court of:

(A) subject to Paragraph (B), not less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000; or

(B) for a county judge presiding in the county court over guardianship proceedings, as defined by Section 1002.015, Estates Code, or over probate proceedings, as defined by Section 22.029, Estates Code, not less than:

(i) $100,000 for a court in a county with a population of 125,000 or less; or

(ii) $250,000 for a court in a county with a population of more than 125,000; and

(3) is conditioned that the judge will:

(A) faithfully perform all duties of office; and

(B) for a county judge presiding in the county court over guardianship or probate proceedings, perform the duties required by the Estates Code.

(b) The bond executed as required by Subsection (a) must be approved by the commissioners court.

(c) In lieu of the bond required by Subsection (a)(2)(B), a county may elect to obtain insurance against losses caused by the gross negligence of a county judge in performing the duties of office. The commissioners court of a county shall pay the premium for the insurance out of the general funds of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 515 (S.B. 40), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 26.002. TERMS; TERMS AND SESSIONS OF COURT FOLLOWING CERTAIN DISASTERS. (a) By order entered on its records, the commissioners court subject to Subsection (b-1) may fix the number of court terms, may set the times at which the terms shall be held, including the four terms required by the constitution, and may set the length of each term.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the court must be open at all times for the transaction of probate business.

(b-1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a county court from holding its terms in accordance with the order of the commissioners court, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the county judge, may designate the terms and sessions of court.

(c) All terms of court must be held at the county seat.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 9, eff. June 7, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 10, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 26.003. ADJOURNMENT OF COURT BY SHERIFF OR CONSTABLE. If the county judge fails to appear at the time appointed for holding court and a visiting judge is not appointed, the sheriff shall adjourn the court from day to day for three days. If the sheriff fails to adjourn the court, a constable shall do so. If the judge does not appear on the fourth day and no visiting judge is appointed, the sheriff or constable shall adjourn the court until the next regular term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.004. MINUTES OF COURT. (a) Each morning, the minutes of the proceedings of the preceding day shall be read in open court. On the last day of the session, the minutes shall be read, corrected if necessary, and signed in open court by the county judge.

(b) A visiting judge shall sign the minutes of the proceedings before the visiting judge.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 602, Sec. 19(1), eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 602 (H.B. 585), Sec. 19(1), eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 26.005. SEAL. (a) Each county court shall be provided with a seal that has a star with five points engraved in the center. The seal must also have "County Court of ____________ County, Texas" engraved on it.

(b) The seal shall be impressed on all process other than subpoenas issued out of the court and shall be used to authenticate the official acts of the county clerk and county judge. The seal may be created using electronic means, including by using an optical disk or another electronic reproduction technique, if the means by which the seal is impressed on an original document created using the same type of electronic means does not allow for changes, additions, or deletions to be made to the document.

(c) The signature of the county clerk may be affixed on an original document using electronic means, provided those means meet the requirements described by Subsection (b).

(d) A seal impressed or a signature affixed by electronic means may be delivered or transmitted electronically.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 1728), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 26.006. SALARY SUPPLEMENT FROM STATE FOR CERTAIN COUNTY JUDGES. (a) A county judge is entitled to an annual salary supplement from the state in an amount equal to 18 percent of the state base salary paid to a district judge as set by the General Appropriations Act in accordance with Section 659.012(a) if at least 18 percent of the:

(1) functions that the judge performs are judicial functions; or

(2) total hours that the judge works are in the performance of judicial functions.

(b) To receive a supplement under Subsection (a), a county judge must file with the comptroller's judiciary section an affidavit stating that at least 18 percent of the:

(1) functions that the judge performs are judicial functions; or

(2) total hours that the judge works are in the performance of judicial functions.

(c) The commissioners court in a county with a county judge who is entitled to receive a salary supplement under this section may not reduce the county funds provided for the salary or office of the county judge as a result of the salary supplement required by this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1166, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1467, Sec. 1.08, eff. June 19, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1572, Sec. 4, eff. Oct. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 11), Sec. 2, eff. December 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1353 (S.B. 497), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 850 (S.B. 1025), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1121 (H.B. 2384), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 2.12(a), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 26.009. LOCATION OF PROCEEDINGS FOLLOWING CERTAIN DISASTERS. (a) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 17, eff. June 7, 2019.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 26.002(c), if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes the county court from conducting its proceedings at the county seat, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected county court, may designate for the proceedings an alternate location:

(1) in the county; or

(2) outside the county at the location the presiding judge determines is closest in proximity to the county seat that allows the court to safely and practicably conduct its proceedings, provided the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region for the designated location approves if that presiding judge is not the presiding judge making the designation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1076 (H.B. 2766), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 11, eff. June 7, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 17, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 26.010. APPOINTMENT OF COUNSEL IN CERTAIN APPEALS. (a) On a written application of any party to an eviction suit, the county court or county court at law in which an appeal of the suit is filed may appoint any qualified attorney who is willing to provide pro bono services in the matter or counsel from a list provided by a pro bono legal services program of counsel willing to be appointed to handle appeals under this section to attend to the cause of a party who:

(1) was in possession of the residence at the time the eviction suit was filed in the justice court; and

(2) has perfected the appeal on a pauper's affidavit approved in accordance with Rule 749a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(b) The appointed counsel shall represent the individual in the proceedings of the suit in the county court or county court at law. At the conclusion of those proceedings, the appointment terminates.

(c) The court may terminate representation appointed under this section for cause.

(d) Appointed counsel may not receive attorney's fees unless the recovery of attorney's fees is provided for by contract, statute, common law, court rules, or other regulations. The county is not responsible for payment of attorney's fees to appointed counsel.

(e) The court shall provide for a method of service of written notice on the parties to an eviction suit of the right to request an appointment of counsel on perfection of appeal on approval of a pauper's affidavit.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1183 (H.B. 3637), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. APPOINTMENT OF VISITING JUDGE

Sec. 26.011. ASSIGNMENT OF VISITING JUDGE. If a county judge is absent, incapacitated, or disqualified in a civil or criminal case, the presiding judge shall appoint a visiting judge to hear the case in accordance with Subchapter C, Chapter 74.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.012. ASSIGNMENT OF VISITING JUDGE FOR PROBATE, GUARDIANSHIP, AND MENTAL HEALTH MATTERS. (a) If the county judge is absent, incapacitated, recused, or disqualified to act in a probate, guardianship, or mental health matter, a visiting judge shall be assigned in accordance with Section 25.0022(h).

(b) Notwithstanding Section 25.0022(t)(4), a visiting judge may be assigned under this section if the judge has served as an active judge for at least 48 months in a statutory probate court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1031 (H.B. 1438), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (H.B. 103), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 26.015. VISITING JUDGE TO TAKE OATH. In addition to any oath previously taken, a person appointed as a visiting judge of a constitutional county court, including a person who is a retired, former, or active judge, shall take the oath of office required by the constitution.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 456, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 782, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.016. RECORD. When a visiting judge is appointed, the clerk shall enter in the minutes as a part of the proceedings in the cause a record that gives the visiting judge's name and shows that:

(1) the judge of the court was disqualified, absent, or disabled to try the cause;

(2) the visiting judge was appointed; and

(3) in addition to any oath previously taken, the oath of office prescribed by law for the visiting judge, including a person who is a retired, former, or active judge, was duly administered to the visiting judge.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 456, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 782, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.017. APPOINTMENT OF ACTING COUNTY JUDGE. (a) Upon the suspension of a constitutional county judge by the State Commission on Judicial Conduct under Section 1-a, Article V, Texas Constitution, the commissioners court may appoint a resident of the county to fill the office until the next term of that office or until the suspension ends, whichever event occurs first.

(b) The commissioners court shall compensate the acting judge by the day, week, or month in an amount equal to the compensation of the regular judge. For budget amendment purposes under Chapter 111, Local Government Code, this requirement shall constitute an emergency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 336, Sec. 1, eff. June 8, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 26.015 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(31), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER C. APPOINTMENT OF VISITING JUDGES IN CERTAIN COUNTIES

Sec. 26.020. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "former constitutional county judge" means a person who:

(1) served as a judge for at least 96 months in a constitutional county court; or

(2) served as a judge for at least 48 months in a constitutional county court and who is a licensed attorney in this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (H.B. 103), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 26.021. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to a county in which:

(1) there is no statutory county court at law or statutory probate court; and

(2) all duties of the county court devolve on the county judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.022. APPOINTMENT FOR PARTICULAR MATTERS. (a) The county judge for good cause may at any time appoint a visiting judge with respect to any pending civil or criminal matter.

(b) The visiting judge may be appointed on motion of the court or on motion of any counsel of record in the matter. Each counsel of record is entitled to notice and hearing on the matter.

(c) To be appointed a visiting judge, a person must be agreed on by the counsels of record, if the counsels are able to agree.

(d) The motion for appointment and the order appointing the visiting judge shall be noted on the docket. A written motion or order may be filed among the papers of the case.

(e) The visiting judge has the powers of the county judge in relation to the matter involved.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 782, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.023. APPOINTMENT FOR ABSENCE OF JUDGE. (a) The county judge may appoint a retired judge, former constitutional county judge, or a constitutional county judge from another county as a visiting judge when the county judge is absent from the county or absent because of physical incapacity.

(b) The visiting judge shall sit in all matters that are docketed on any of the county court's dockets and has the powers of the county judge in relation to the matter involved.

(c) Without the consent of the commissioners court, visiting judges appointed under this section may not sit for more than 15 working days during a calendar year.

(d) The order appointing the visiting judge shall be noted in the docket of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 782, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (H.B. 103), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 26.024. APPOINTMENT TO SHARE BENCH. (a) The county judge may appoint a retired judge, former constitutional county judge, or a constitutional county judge from another county as a visiting judge to share the bench if the county judge finds that the dockets of the county court reflect a case load that the county judge considers to be in excess of that which can be disposed of properly in a manner consistent with the efficient administration of justice.

(b) The visiting judge may share the bench for periods authorized by the commissioners court.

(c) The visiting judge shall sit in those matters authorized by the county judge and has the powers of the county judge in relation to those matters.

(d) The order appointing the visiting judge shall be noted on the docket of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 782, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (H.B. 103), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 26.026. COMPENSATION OF VISITING JUDGE. A visiting judge appointed under this subchapter is entitled to compensation from the commissioners court for each day the judge sits as visiting judge at the rate according to law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.027. NO ADMINISTRATIVE POWERS. A visiting judge appointed under this subchapter does not have the powers of the county judge as a member and presiding officer of the commissioners court or the powers of the county judge relating to the general administration of county business.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1388, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 26.028. ATTORNEY RECOMMENDATIONS. The county judge shall consider the recommendations of attorneys of the court as to the implementation of this subchapter and the accomplishment of its purposes.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER D. JURISDICTION AND POWERS

Sec. 26.041. GENERAL JURISDICTION; CHANGES. A county court has the jurisdiction conferred by this subchapter and other law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.38, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.042. CIVIL JURISDICTION; JUVENILE JURISDICTION. (a) A county court has concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds $200 in value but does not exceed $20,000, exclusive of interest.

(b) A county court has juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 23.001.

(c) If under Subchapter E a county court has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction, an appeal or writ of error may not be taken to the court of appeals from a final judgment of the county court in a civil case in which:

(1) the county court has appellate or original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts; and

(2) the judgment or amount in controversy does not exceed $250, exclusive of interest and costs.

(d) A county court has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds $500 but does not exceed $5,000, exclusive of interest.

(e) A county court has appellate jurisdiction in civil cases over which the justice courts have original jurisdiction in cases in which the judgment appealed from or the amount in controversy exceeds $250, exclusive of costs.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.39, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 745, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 776, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 383 (S.B. 618), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 553 (S.B. 1413), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 696 (S.B. 2342), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2020.

Sec. 26.043. CIVIL MATTERS IN WHICH COUNTY COURT IS WITHOUT JURISDICTION. A county court does not have jurisdiction in:

(1) a suit to recover damages for slander or defamation of character;

(2) a suit for the enforcement of a lien on land;

(3) a suit in behalf of the state for escheat;

(4) a suit for divorce;

(5) a suit for the forfeiture of a corporate charter;

(6) a suit for the trial of the right to property valued at $500 or more and levied on under a writ of execution, sequestration, or attachment;

(7) an eminent domain case; or

(8) a suit for the recovery of land.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.40, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.044. CERTIORARI JURISDICTION. A county court has jurisdiction in cases brought from justice court by certiorari.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.045. ORIGINAL CRIMINAL JURISDICTION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a county court has exclusive original jurisdiction of misdemeanors other than misdemeanors involving official misconduct and cases in which the highest fine that may be imposed is $500 or less.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a county court has jurisdiction in the forfeiture and final judgment of bonds and recognizances taken in criminal cases within the court's jurisdiction.

(c) Except as provided by Subsections (d) and (f), a county court that is in a county with a criminal district court does not have any criminal jurisdiction.

(d) A county court in a county with a population of 2.1 million or more has original jurisdiction over cases alleging a violation of Section 25.093, Education Code, or alleging truant conduct under Section 65.003(a), Family Code.

(e) Subsections (c) and (d) do not affect the jurisdiction of a statutory county court.

(f) A county court has concurrent jurisdiction with a municipal court in cases that arise in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction and that arise under an ordinance of the municipality applicable to the extraterritorial jurisdiction under Section 216.902, Local Government Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.41, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 45, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 20, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 137, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 612 (H.B. 413), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 148 (H.B. 734), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 26.046. APPELLATE CRIMINAL JURISDICTION. A county court has appellate jurisdiction in criminal cases of which justice courts and other inferior courts have original jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.047. HABEAS CORPUS. (a) A county court may issue a writ of habeas corpus in any case in which the constitution has not conferred the power on the district courts.

(b) On return of a writ of habeas corpus, the court may remand to custody, admit to bail, or discharge the person imprisoned or detained, as the law and nature of the case require.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.048. MOTIONS AGAINST COURT OFFICERS. A county court may hear and determine any motion against the sheriff or another officer of the court for failure to pay money collected under process of the court or for other defalcation of duty in connection with a process of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.049. APPOINTMENT OF COUNSEL. The county judge may appoint counsel to represent a party who makes an affidavit that he is too poor to employ counsel.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.050. POWERS OF LAW AND EQUITY. Subject to the limitations stated in this chapter and in the constitution, a county court may hear and determine any cause in law or equity that a court of law or equity recognizes and may grant any relief that may be granted by a court of law or equity.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.051. WRIT POWER. A county judge, in either term time or vacation, may grant writs of mandamus, injunction, sequestration, attachment, garnishment, certiorari, and supersedeas and all other writs necessary to the enforcement of the court's jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.42, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.052. PROBATE AND MENTAL HEALTH CODE CASES. (a) In a county in which the county court and any county court created by statute have jurisdiction in both probate matters and proceedings under Subtitle C, Title 7, Health and Safety Code, during each year for which a statement has been filed as provided by Subsection (b), those cases and proceedings must be filed in a county court created by statute with jurisdiction of those cases and proceedings.

(b) A county judge may file, not later than January 15 of each year, a statement with the county clerk electing not to hear probate matters and proceedings under Subtitle C, Title 7, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 746, Sec. 65, eff. Oct. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 4.01, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER E. PROVISIONS RELATING TO PARTICULAR COUNTIES

Sec. 26.103. ANGELINA COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Angelina County begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October and may continue for three weeks.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.104. ARANSAS COUNTY. The County Court of Aransas County has no probate, juvenile, civil, or criminal jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 688, Sec. 2, eff. June 13, 2001.

Sec. 26.106. ARMSTRONG COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Armstrong County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.107. ATASCOSA COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Atascosa County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.109. BAILEY COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Bailey County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.111. BASTROP COUNTY. (a) If the county judge is licensed to practice law in this state, the County Court of Bastrop County has jurisdiction concurrent with the County Court at Law of Bastrop County over all causes and proceedings, civil and criminal, juvenile and probate, original and appellate, over which by the constitution and general laws of this state county courts have jurisdiction.

(b) If the county judge is not licensed to practice law in this state, the County Court of Bastrop County has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court at law only in probate proceedings, administrations of estates, guardianship proceedings, mental illness proceedings, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b).

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.22(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.112. BAYLOR COUNTY. The County Court of Baylor County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, the general criminal jurisdiction of a county court, and jurisdiction over cases and proceedings involving protective orders but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1146, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1075 (H.B. 3321), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 26.113. BEE COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Bee County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.115. BEXAR COUNTY. The County Court of Bexar County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and of a juvenile court as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.116. BLANCO COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Blanco County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The terms of the county court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, August, and November and continue for six weeks or until the court has disposed of its business. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Without reference to the 1985 repeal of V.T.C.S. Art. 1970-306, from which this section was derived, that article was also amended by Sec. 42, Ch. 159, Acts 69th Leg., 1985.

Sec. 26.119. BOWIE COUNTY. The County Court of Bowie County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.122. BREWSTER COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Brewster County begin on the third Mondays in February, May, August, and November and continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.126. BURLESON COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Burleson County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.131. CAMERON COUNTY. The County Court of Cameron County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.134. CASS COUNTY. The County Court of Cass County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction except juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) and criminal jurisdiction to receive and enter guilty pleas in misdemeanor cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.135. CASTRO COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Castro County begin on the fourth Mondays in February, May, August, and November and continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.140. COCHRAN COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Cochran County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.143. COLLIN COUNTY. The County Court of Collin County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.144. COLLINGSWORTH COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Collingsworth County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.145. COLORADO COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Colorado County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.146. COMAL COUNTY. The County Court of Comal County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.149. COOKE COUNTY. (a) The County Court of Cooke County does not have probate, guardianship, mental health, juvenile, civil, criminal, or appellate jurisdiction.

(b) The judge of the County Court of Cooke County is exempt from the judicial training and instruction required under Chapter 22.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 535, Sec. 2, eff. Dec. 1, 2001.

Sec. 26.151. COTTLE COUNTY. The County Court of Cottle County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, the general criminal jurisdiction of a county court, and jurisdiction over cases and proceedings involving protective orders but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1147, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1075 (H.B. 3321), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 26.154. CROSBY COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Crosby County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.157. DALLAS COUNTY. The County Court of Dallas County has no appellate criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.158. DAWSON COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Dawson County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.159. DEAF SMITH COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Deaf Smith County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.161. DENTON COUNTY. The County Court of Denton County has no probate, juvenile, civil, or criminal jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.23(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 746, Sec. 66(a), eff. Oct. 1, 1991.

Sec. 26.163. DICKENS COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Dickens County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.164. DIMMIT COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Dimmit County begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October and may continue for three weeks.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.167. EASTLAND COUNTY. The County Court of Eastland County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil jurisdiction except juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) and concurrent with the district court the criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 15, Sec. 2, eff. April 14, 1987.

Sec. 26.169. EDWARDS COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Edwards County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The terms of the county court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, August, and November and continue until the Saturday before the Monday on which the next term begins. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.171. EL PASO COUNTY. The County Court of El Paso County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.173. FALLS COUNTY. The County Court of Falls County has:

(1) the general jurisdiction of a probate court;

(2) juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b); and

(3) original and appellate jurisdiction in all matters over which county courts have jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.24(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.175. FAYETTE COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Fayette County has the following jurisdiction concurrent with the district court if the county judge is licensed to practice law in this state and practiced law for at least two years before his appointment or election:

(1) jurisdiction over cases and proceedings under the Family Code;

(2) eminent domain jurisdiction; and

(3) civil jurisdiction in cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds $500 and does not exceed $20,000.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 523, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1987.

Sec. 26.176. FISHER COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Fisher County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.180. FRANKLIN COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Franklin County begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October and continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.183. GAINES COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Gaines County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.185. GARZA COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Garza County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.186. GILLESPIE COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Gillespie County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The terms of the county court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, August, and November and continue for six weeks or until the court has disposed of its business. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.188. GOLIAD COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Goliad County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.189. GONZALES COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Gonzales County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.191. GRAYSON COUNTY. The County Court of Grayson County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.192. GREGG COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Gregg County begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October and continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.200. HARDIN COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Hardin County continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.204. HASKELL COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Haskell County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.206. HEMPHILL COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Hemphill County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.208. HIDALGO COUNTY. The County Court of Hidalgo County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.209. HILL COUNTY. (a) The County Court of Hill County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and has concurrent original and appellate jurisdiction with the 66th District Court over civil and criminal matters within the jurisdiction of the county court.

(b) All civil and criminal matters within the jurisdiction of the county court must be filed with the district clerk in the district court.

(c) The judge of the 66th District Court shall act as presiding judge between the district and county courts and may assign to the county court original or appellate cases that are within the county court's jurisdiction and assign to a county court at law cases that are within the jurisdiction of the county court at law. The assignment shall be made by docket notation.

(d) The district clerk of Hill County shall perform all clerical functions of the county court as to matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts. The district clerk shall charge the fees set by law for county courts in any case within the courts' concurrent jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 959 (H.B. 1622), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 26.210. HOCKLEY COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Hockley County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.218. IRION COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Irion County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The terms of the county court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, August, and November and continue for six weeks or until the court has disposed of its business. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.223. JEFFERSON COUNTY. (a) If the county judge is licensed to practice law in this state, the County Court of Jefferson County has jurisdiction concurrent with the County Court at Law of Jefferson County over all causes and proceedings, civil and criminal, juvenile and probate, original and appellate, over which by the constitution and general laws of this state county courts have jurisdiction.

(a-1) If the county judge is not licensed to practice law in this state, the County Court of Jefferson County has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Jefferson County only in probate proceedings, administrations of estates, guardianship proceedings, mental illness proceedings, and juvenile matters as provided by Section 26.042(b).

(b) The terms of the county court continue until the court has disposed of its business. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 3.08, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 26.226. JOHNSON COUNTY. The County Court of Johnson County has:

(1) the general jurisdiction of a probate court;

(2) juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b); and

(3) original and appellate jurisdiction over all matters over which county courts have jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.26(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.227. JONES COUNTY. The County Court of Jones County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.228. KARNES COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Karnes County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.232. KENT COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Kent County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.233. KERR COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Kerr County continue for three weeks or until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.234. KIMBLE COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Kimble County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.235. KING COUNTY. The County Court of King County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, the general criminal jurisdiction of a county court, and jurisdiction over cases and proceedings involving protective orders but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1495, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1075 (H.B. 3321), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 26.238. KNOX COUNTY. The County Court of Knox County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, the general criminal jurisdiction of a county court, and jurisdiction over cases and proceedings involving protective orders but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1148, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1075 (H.B. 3321), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 26.240. LAMB COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Lamb County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.241. LAMPASAS COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Lampasas County begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October and continue until the business is completed.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.244. LEE COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Lee County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.252. LUBBOCK COUNTY. The County Court of Lubbock County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.253. LYNN COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Lynn County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.256. MCMULLEN COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of McMullen County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.258. MARION COUNTY. The County Court of Marion County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, general criminal jurisdiction, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 187, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 26.260. MASON COUNTY. The County Court of Mason County has:

(1) the general jurisdiction of a probate court;

(2) juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b); and

(3) original and appellate jurisdiction in all matters over which county courts have jurisdiction under the constitution and general laws of this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.28(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.261. MATAGORDA COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Matagorda County begin on the third Mondays in February, May, August, and November and continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.264. MENARD COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Menard County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The terms of the county court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, August, and November and continue for six weeks or until the business is completed. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.267. MILLS COUNTY. The County Court of Mills County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, general criminal jurisdiction, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b), but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.268. MITCHELL COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Mitchell County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.272. MORRIS COUNTY. The County Court of Morris County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, general criminal jurisdiction, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.274. NACOGDOCHES COUNTY. The County Court of Nacogdoches County has no probate, criminal, or civil jurisdiction except juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.275. NAVARRO COUNTY. The County Court of Navarro County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, general criminal jurisdiction, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.278. NUECES COUNTY. The County Court of Nueces County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.280. OLDHAM COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Oldham County begin on the fourth Mondays in February, May, August, and November and continue until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.285. PARMER COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Parmer County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.291. RANDALL COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Randall County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.292. REAGAN COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Reagan County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.294. RED RIVER COUNTY. (a) The County Court of Red River County has:

(1) the general jurisdiction of a probate court;

(2) jurisdiction to enter orders providing for the support of deserted wives or children, pendente lite, and to punish violations of those orders;

(3) juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b); and

(4) original criminal jurisdiction.

(b) The county court has no other civil jurisdiction or appellate criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.295. REEVES COUNTY. The County Court of Reeves County has juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other probate, criminal, or civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.298. ROBERTSON COUNTY. The County Court of Robertson County has:

(1) the general jurisdiction of a probate court;

(2) juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b); and

(3) original and appellate jurisdiction in all matters over which county courts have jurisdiction under the constitution and general laws of this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.29(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.302. SABINE COUNTY. (a) The County Court of Sabine County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, general criminal jurisdiction, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil jurisdiction.

(b) The terms of the County Court of Sabine County begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October and may continue for three weeks. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.303. SAN AUGUSTINE COUNTY. The County Court of San Augustine County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court, general criminal jurisdiction, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.307. SCHLEICHER COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Schleicher County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.308. SCURRY COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Scurry County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.309. SHACKELFORD COUNTY. The County Court of Shackelford County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.314. STARR COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Starr County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.315. STEPHENS COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Stephens County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The district clerk shall maintain the records of the County Court of Stephens County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 3.002, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 26.316. STERLING COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Sterling County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil and criminal matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.317. STONEWALL COUNTY. (a) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Stonewall County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

(b) The terms of the county court continue until the court has disposed of its business. The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.320. TARRANT COUNTY. The County Court of Tarrant County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other criminal or civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.321. TAYLOR COUNTY. The County Court of Taylor County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other criminal or civil jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 71, Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 1993.

Sec. 26.323. TERRY COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Terry County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.327. TRAVIS COUNTY. The County Court of Travis County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.328. TRINITY COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Trinity County begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October and may continue for three weeks.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.330. UPSHUR COUNTY. (a) The County Court of Upshur County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and has concurrent jurisdiction with the district court in all other matters over which county courts are given jurisdiction by the constitution and general laws of this state.

(b) All civil and criminal matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts must be filed with the county clerk in the county court.

(c) The county judge shall act as presiding judge between the county and district courts and may assign to the district court original or appellate cases that are within the concurrent jurisdiction of the courts. The assignment shall be made by docket notation.

(d) The county clerk shall perform all clerical functions of the county court as to matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts. The county clerk shall charge the fees set by law for county courts in any case within the courts' concurrent jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.30(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 26.336. WALKER COUNTY. The County Court of Walker County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.337. WALLER COUNTY. The County Court of Waller County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.339. WASHINGTON COUNTY. The County Court of Washington County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 943, Sec. 10, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 26.340. WEBB COUNTY. The County Court of Webb County has the general jurisdiction of a probate court and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil or criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.342. WHEELER COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Wheeler County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.343. WICHITA COUNTY. (a) The County Court of Wichita County has general criminal jurisdiction, the general jurisdiction of a probate court, and juvenile jurisdiction as provided by Section 26.042(b) but has no other civil jurisdiction except as prescribed by Subsection (b).

(b) The county court has jurisdiction over cases involving child neglect or dependency proceedings and may punish contempt growing out of or ancillary to those cases if the county judge:

(1) has the qualifications required of a district judge; and

(2) is designated by the Wichita County Juvenile Board as judge of the juvenile court.

(c) With the county judge's approval a district court in Wichita County may transfer to the county court a case involving juvenile delinquency, child neglect, or dependency proceedings.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.351. YOAKUM COUNTY. In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the County Court of Yoakum County has original concurrent jurisdiction with the justice courts in all civil matters in which the justice courts have jurisdiction under general law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 26.353. ZAPATA COUNTY. (a) The terms of the County Court of Zapata County begin on the third Mondays in February, May, September, and November and continue for three weeks or until the court has disposed of its business.

(b) The commissioners court may change the court terms under Section 26.002.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.